Vermont, session 2025-2026, S185.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. § 4348a(a)(12)(C) is amended to read:
(C) Village areas. These areas include the traditional settlement area
or a proposed new settlement area, typically composed of a cohesive mix of
residential, civic, religious, commercial, and mixed-use buildings, arranged
along a main street and intersecting streets that are within walking distance for
residents who live within and surrounding the core. These areas include
existing village center designations and similar areas statewide, but this area is
larger than the village center designation. Village areas shall meet the
following criteria:
VT LEG #385470 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.185
2026 Page 2 of 4
* * *
(iv) The municipality has either municipal public water or, public
wastewater. If no public wastewater is available, the area must have, or soils
that are adequate for wastewater disposal.
* * *
Sec. 2. 24 V.S.A. § 4348a(a)(12)(D) is amended to read:
(D) Transition or infill area. These areas include areas of existing or
planned commercial, office, mixed-use development, or residential uses either
adjacent to a planned growth or village area; or a new stand-alone transition or
infill area and served by, or planned for proximate to an area served by, public
water or wastewater, or both, an area where public water or wastewater is
planned for, or an area with soils that are adequate for wastewater disposal.
The intent of this land use category is to transform these areas into higher-
density, mixed-use settlements, or residential neighborhoods through infill and
redevelopment or new development. New commercial linear strip
development is not allowed as to prevent it negatively impacting the economic
vitality of commercial areas in the adjacent or nearby planned growth or
village area. This area could also include adjacent greenfields safer from
flooding and planned for future growth.
VT LEG #385470 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.185
2026 Page 3 of 4
Sec. 3. 24 V.S.A. § 5804 is amended to read:
§ 5804. DESIGNATED NEIGHBORHOOD
(a) Designation established.
(1) A regional planning commission may request approval from the
LURB for designation of areas on the regional plan future land use maps as a
designated neighborhood under 10 V.S.A. § 6033. Areas eligible for
designation include planned growth areas and village areas identified on the
regional plan future land use map. This designation recognizes that the vitality
of downtowns and villages is supported by adjacent and walkable
neighborhoods and that the benefits structure must ensure that investments for
sprawl repair or infill development within a neighborhood is secondary to a
primary purpose to maintain the vitality and livability and maximize the
climate resilience and infill potential of centers.
(2) The areas eligible for designation are planned growth areas and
village areas identified on the regional plan future land use map. Transition
areas and infill areas are also eligible if located within a workforce housing
zone.
(3) Approval of planned growth areas and village areas or transition
areas and infill areas within a workforce housing zone as designated
neighborhoods shall follow the same process as approval for designated
VT LEG #385470 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.185
2026 Page 4 of 4
centers provided for in 10 V.S.A. § 6033 and consistent with sections 4348 and
4348a of this title.
* * *
Sec. 4. 24 V.S.A. § 5801 is amended to read:
§ 5801. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(16) “Centroid” means a point in a U.S. census block located in the
geographic center of the polygon it represents, and containing the same
attributes.
(17) “Workforce housing zone” means an area in Vermont with an
enhanced demand for housing due to its proximity to a job-rich census tract in
Vermont or an adjoining state. Specifically, it is an area within:
(A) six miles of the centroid of a census tract that has 7,200 or more
jobs;
(B) five miles of the centroid of a census tract that has 5,000 to 7,199
jobs; or
(C) 3.5 miles of the centroid of a census tract that has 2,500 to 4,999
jobs.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385470 v.3